dev/mt_brokenplurals/appendix1.fat.dix
  <!-- sajf; s; 2 -->
    <pardef n="s/ajf__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ajf</l>
          <r>ajf<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>juf</l>
          <r>ajf<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ċint; ċ; 2 -->
    <pardef n="ċ/int__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>int</l>
          <r>int<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nut</l>
          <r>int<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- gżira; gż; 2 -->
    <pardef n="gż/ira__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ira</l>
          <r>ira<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ejjer</l>
          <r>ira<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- xibka; x; 3 -->
    <pardef n="x/ibka__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ibka</l>
          <r>ibka<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>biek</l>
          <r>ibka<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bieki</l>
          <r>ibka<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- fixxa; fix; 2 -->
    <pardef n="fix/xa__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>xa</l>
          <r>xa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ex</l>
          <r>xa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- sidrija; s; 2 -->
    <pardef n="s/idrija__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>idrija</l>
          <r>idrija<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dieri</l>
          <r>idrija<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- għamara; għama; 2 -->
    <pardef n="għama/ra__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ra</l>
          <r>ra<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jjar</l>
          <r>ra<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- gurbell; g; 2 -->
    <pardef n="g/urbell__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>urbell</l>
          <r>urbell<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>riebel</l>
          <r>urbell<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- kewkba; ke; 2 -->
    <pardef n="ke/wkba__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>wkba</l>
          <r>wkba<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kwieb</l>
          <r>wkba<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- bilbla; b; 2 -->
    <pardef n="b/ilbla__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ilbla</l>
          <r>ilbla<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>liebel</l>
          <r>ilbla<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- perċa; per; 2 -->
    <pardef n="per/ċa__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ċa</l>
          <r>ċa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eċ</l>
          <r>ċa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- qandul; q; 3 -->
    <pardef n="q/andul__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>andul</l>
          <r>andul<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nadel</l>
          <r>andul<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>niedel</l>
          <r>andul<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ħarpun; ħ; 3 -->
    <pardef n="ħ/arpun__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arpun</l>
          <r>arpun<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rapen</l>
          <r>arpun<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>riepen</l>
          <r>arpun<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- qanpiena; q; 2 -->
    <pardef n="q/anpiena__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anpiena</l>
          <r>anpiena<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>niepel</l>
          <r>anpiena<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ġiżirana; ġiżira; 2 -->
    <pardef n="ġiżira/na__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>na</l>
          <r>na<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jjen</l>
          <r>na<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- kappell; k; 2 -->
    <pardef n="k/appell__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>appell</l>
          <r>appell<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>piepel</l>
          <r>appell<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- kelma; k; 2 -->
    <pardef n="k/elma__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>elma</l>
          <r>elma<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>liem</l>
          <r>elma<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- gerżuma; g; 2 -->
    <pardef n="g/erżuma__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erżuma</l>
          <r>erżuma<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rieżem</l>
          <r>erżuma<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- qarib; q; 3 -->
    <pardef n="q/arib__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arib</l>
          <r>arib<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>raba</l>
          <r>arib<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rieba</l>
          <r>arib<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- tarf; t; 2 -->
    <pardef n="t/arf__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arf</l>
          <r>arf<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ruf</l>
          <r>arf<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- għadira; għad; 2 -->
    <pardef n="għad/ira__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ira</l>
          <r>ira<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ajjar</l>
          <r>ira<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- xewka; x; 2 -->
    <pardef n="x/ewka__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ewka</l>
          <r>ewka<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>wiek</l>
          <r>ewka<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- saħħar; s; 2 -->
    <pardef n="s/aħħar__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aħħar</l>
          <r>aħħar<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ħaħar</l>
          <r>aħħar<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="sajf"><i>s</i><par n="s/ajf__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ċint"><i>ċ</i><par n="ċ/int__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="gżira"><i>gż</i><par n="gż/ira__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="xibka"><i>x</i><par n="x/ibka__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="fixxa"><i>fix</i><par n="fix/xa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="sidrija"><i>s</i><par n="s/idrija__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="għamara"><i>għama</i><par n="għama/ra__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="gurbell"><i>g</i><par n="g/urbell__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="kewkba"><i>ke</i><par n="ke/wkba__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="bilbla"><i>b</i><par n="b/ilbla__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="perċa"><i>per</i><par n="per/ċa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="qandul"><i>q</i><par n="q/andul__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ħarpun"><i>ħ</i><par n="ħ/arpun__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="qanpiena"><i>q</i><par n="q/anpiena__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ġiżirana"><i>ġiżira</i><par n="ġiżira/na__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="kappell"><i>k</i><par n="k/appell__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="kelma"><i>k</i><par n="k/elma__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="gerżuma"><i>g</i><par n="g/erżuma__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="qarib"><i>q</i><par n="q/arib__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="tarf"><i>t</i><par n="t/arf__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="għadira"><i>għad</i><par n="għad/ira__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="xewka"><i>x</i><par n="x/ewka__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="saħħar"><i>s</i><par n="s/aħħar__n_GD"/></e>
